Massachusetts, session 194th, H1074.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 70 of Chapter 131 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby
amended by inserting after the last paragraph the following new paragraph;
"Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, or any other section under chapter 131,
the director may, with the approval of the board, may establish a season for deer with the use of a
rifle, revolver or pistol. Such seasons may be established in appropriate deer hunting zones as
determined by the director after assessing considerations including, but not limited to, human
population and housing densities."
of 1